apertium-miq.miq.lexd
# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <prn>    # Pronoun

# <pos>    # Possessive
# <geN>    # Genetive
# <def>    # Definite
# <ind>    # Indefinite
# <dem>    # Demonstrative
# <ing>    # Interrogative
# <incl>   # Inclusive
# <subj>   # Subject
# <obj>    # Object

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Distance morphology
# <prx>    # Porximate
# <dst>    # Distant

#Gender morphology
# <m>      # Male
# <f>      # Female

# Verbs
# <vkaia>  # to be verb
# <inf>    # infinitive
# <p1>     # 1st person
# <p2>     # 2nd person
# <p3>     # 3rd person
# <past>   # Past
# <pprs>   # Present Participle aka Present 1
# <pres>   # Present
# <fut>    # Future
# <ffi>    # Future Absolute/Definite
# <neg>    # Negative

# Adjective morphology
# <comp>   # Comparative for inferiority, superiority, and equality

# <cnjcoo> # Co-ordinating conjunction

# Other symbols
# Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Nouns
Verbs
Punctuation
Determiners(1) [ <det>: ] Determiners(2):
Pronouns(1) [ <prn>: ] Pronouns(2):
Adverbs [ <adv>: ]
Adjectives [ <adj>: ]
Postpositions [ <post>: ]
Exclamation
Conjunctions [ <cnjcoo>: ]

PATTERN Nouns
N-Stems [ <n>: ] (Possession | Genitive)?
N-Stems [ <n>+ra<post>:ra ]

PATTERN Verbs

V-Stems [ <v>: ]
V-Stems [ <v>: ] V-Tenses
V-Kaia
V-Irr(1) [ <v>: ] V-Irr(2):


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON N-Stems

aian:aian               # "iron"
aras:aras               # "horse"
baisikil:baisikil       # "bicycle"
bîp:bîp                 # "cow/beef"
buk:buk                 # "book"
cuartocana:cuartocana   # "room"
daktar:daktar           # "doctor"
dur:dur                 # "door"
gabament:gabament       # "government"
gul:gul                 # "gold"
hotel:hotel             # "hotel"
ilili:ilili             # "shark"
insla:insla             # "farm"
kalila:kalila           # "chicken"
luhpia:luhpia           # "child" (someone's child)
mani:mani               # "summer; year"
mango:mango             # "mango"
pata:pata               # "meal"
piu:piu                 # "time"
piua:piua               # "season"
plis:plis               # "place/area"
pleiski:pleiski         # "place"
plun:plun               # "food"
praidi:praidi           # "Friday"
prais:prais             # "cost/price"
rais:rais               # "Rice/grain"
rum:rum                 # "room"
tibil:tibil             # "table"
timia:timia             # "night"
titan:titan             # "morning"
tutni:tutni             # "afternoon"
tuktan:tuktan           # "child"
sika:sika               # "medicine"
siknis:siknis           # "sickness (maybe allergy)"
wîna:wîna               # "meat/flesh"
yabal:yabal             # "road/street"
yauhka:yauhka           # "tomorrow"

# ADDED HERE

plum:plum               # "food"
sopa:sopa               # "cup"
taim:taim               # "time"
tispun:tispun           # "spoon"
tootnipata:tootnipata   # "dinner"
tiru:tiru               # "knife"
triso:triso             # "fork"
ulta:ulta               # "cup"
aiya:aiya               # "corn"
bir:bir                 # "beer"
brid:brid               # "bread"
chocolatei:chocolatei   # "chocolate"
danlei:danlei           # "honey"
fruta:fruta             # "fruit"
hamon:hamon             # "ham"
inska:inska             # "fish (food)"
keiso:keiso             # "cheese"
kitkumans:kitkumans     # "dessert"
lat:lat                 # "butter/oil"
lobsta:lobsta           # "lobster"
mahabra:mahabra         # "egg"
papas:papas             # "potatoes"
piper:piper             # "pepper"
reis:reis               # "rice"
shugar:shugar           # "sugar"
bookit:bookit           # "can liked canned goods"
bridakisabriska:bridakisabriska # "bakery"
huico:huico             # "fish (animal)"
sap:sap                 # "shop"
sula:sula               # "deer"
cuarto:cuarto           # "room"
katrri:katrri           # "bed"
ki:ki                   # "key"
timia:timia             # "night"
duri:duri               # "small boat"
licien:licien           # "license"
pleem:pleem             # "airplane"
tren:tren               # "train"
truk:truk               # "truck"
yabal:yabal             # "road"
aikam:aikam             # "left"
smiskam:smiskam         # "right"
apis:apis               # "office"
banco:banco             # "bank"
koreiyo:koreiyo         # "post office"
direksion:direksion     # "address"
market:market           # "market"
polis:polis             # "police"
skool:skool             # "school"
telecor:telecor         # "telephone"
cigarette:cigarette     # "cigarette"
bootch:bootch           # "boots"
ion:ion                 # "metal"
cuala:cuala             # "cloth"
prak:prak               # "dress"
pencil:pencil           # "pen"
royo:royo               # "film"
tat:tat                 # "tat"
tow:tow                 # "towel"
trous:trous             # "trousers"
watch:watch             # "watch"
mochila:mochila         # "backpack"
liar:liar               # "lawyer"
pana:pana               # "friend"
yanmamiki:yanmamiki     # "mother"
yanpapiki:yanpapiki     # "father"
tuktan:tuktan           # "child"
lanka:lanka             # "sister"
manuka:manuka           # "brother"
lukpa:lukpa             # "kid"
practis:practis         # "practice"

smasmalkra:smasmalkra     # teacher
tiara:tiara               # teenage-age girl
wahma:wahma               # teenage-age boy
upla:upla                 # people
abiung:abiung             # plane
kiamka:kiamka             # relatives
andris:andris             # orange
bip:bip                   # cow
kabu:kabu                 # sea
yabal:yabal               # road
lî:lî                     # water
mani:mani                 # year
krikri:krikri             # bed
kwirku:kwirku             # pig
kipla:kipla               # rock
tailet:tailet             # toilet
atkisa:atkisa             # speciality (dish)
economia:economia         # economy
drogas:drogas             # drugs
educacion:educacion       # education
imsa:imsa                 # equality
politic:politic           # politics
kabu:kabu                 # ocean
tingni:tingni             # river
uwalpa:uwalpa             # rock
lagun:lagun               # lake
timo:timo                 # shade
dus:dus                   # plants
sililma:sililma           # star
tairi:tairi               # mosquito
powta:powta               # firewood
warakapo:warakapo         # unemployment
warailal:warailal         # employment

mairin:mairin       # "woman"
waitna:waitna       # "man"
wainhka:wainhka     # "male animal"

natka:natka         # way of
raitka:raitka       # truth
lâka:lâka           # law/regulation
indian:indian       # indian
tânka:tânka         # meaning
ulbanka:ulbanka     # writing
kulkanka:kulkanka   # calculation
gabamint:gabamint   # government
sât:sât             # class
sut:sut             # everything
lâ:lâ               # law
dukia:dukia         # belonging
uplika:uplika       # neighbor
iwanka:iwanka       # way of life
daukanka:daukanka   # fact/incident
wark:wark           # work
lalah:lalah         # monkey
tasbaya:tasbaya     # land
aisi:aisi           # speaking
lukanka:lukanka     # belief
brih:brih           # having
warkka:warkka       # worker
sinska:sinska       # intelligence
kuntri:kuntri       # country
nahki:nahki         # how
yus:yus             # use

#Inalienable Nouns
apa:apa                   # tooth
bila:bila                 # mouth
taya:taya                 # skin / extended family
tawa:tawa                 # hair
lal:lal                   # head
biara:biara               # stomach
mina:mina                 # foot
mita:mita                 # hand
kakma:kakma               # nose
kiama:kiama               # ear
tiala:tiala               # nipple
un:un                     # lip
kiskamka:kiskamka         # kidney
auya:auya                 # liver
kupia:kupia               # heart
nina:nina                 # back
nakra:nakra               # eye
karma:karma               # throat

#Kinship Terms
aisa:aisa                 # "father"
yapti:yapti               # "mother"
dama:dama                 # "grandfather"
kuka:kuka                 # "grandmother"
almuk:almuk               # "elder"

LEXICON Possession
<px1sg>:>ki
<px2sg>:>kam
<px3sp>:>ka             # follows 'ai'
<px1pl>:>ka             # specifically follows 'wan'

LEXICON Genitive
<gen>:>ka

LEXICON V-Stems

aiwanaia:aiwan          # "to sing"
alkaia:alk              # "to get"
briaia:bri              # "to have"
buaia:bu                # "to rise"
daukaia:dauk            # "to make"
diaia:di                # "to drink"
ikaia:ik                # "to kill"
irbaia:irb              # "to brush past/shave/tear apart with a machete"
kaikaia:kaik            # "to see"
lukaia:luk              # "to think"
munaia:mun              # "to make/to cause/to test out"
pâlaia:pâl              # "to fly/jump/get furious"
piaia:pi                # "to eat"
prukaia:pruk            # "to hit"
pulaia:pul              # "to play"
takaia:tak              # "to leave / to appear"
takaskaia:takask        # "to stay"
wiaia:wi                # "to say"
wapaia:wap              # "to walk"
yapaia:yap              # "to sleep"
swiaia:swi              # to leave
yawaia:yaw              # to swim
mangkaia:mangk          # to plant
inaia:in                # to cry
yabaia:yab              # to give
lihkaia:lihk            # to like
kangbaia:kangb          # to play

LEXICON V-Kaia

kaia<part>:lika         # a particle to mark a sentence topic

kaia<vkaia><inf>:kaia

kaia<vkaia><past><p1>:kapri
kaia<vkaia><past><p2>:kapram
kaia<vkaia><past><p3>:kan

kaia<vkaia><pres><p1>:sna
kaia<vkaia><pres><p2>:sma
kaia<vkaia><pres><p3>:sa

kaia<vkaia><fut><p1>:kamna
kaia<vkaia><fut><p2>:kama
kaia<vkaia><fut><p3>:kabia

kaia<vkaia><ffi><p1>:kaisna
kaia<vkaia><ffi><p2>:kaisma
kaia<vkaia><ffi><p3>:kaisa

LEXICON V-Irr(2)

yaia:yaia   <inf>

yaia:isna   <pres><p1>
yaia:isma   <pres><p2>
yaia:isa    <pres><p3>

yaia:yari   <past><p1>
yaia:yaram  <past><p2>
yaia:yan    <past><p3>

LEXICON V-Tenses

<inf>:aia

<past><p1>:>ri
<past><p2>:>ram
<past><p3>:>{A}n

<pprs><p1>:>{S}una
<pprs><p2>:>{S}uma
<pprs><p3>:>{S}uya

<pres><p1>:>{I}sna
<pres><p2>:>{I}sma
<pres><p3>:>{I}sa

<pres><neg>:>ras

<fut><p1>:>{A}mna
<fut><p2>:>ma
<fut><p3>:>bia

<ffi><p1>:>aisna
<ffi><p2>:>aisma
<ffi><p3>:>aisa

LEXICON Pronouns(2)

yang:yang       <subj><p1>              # "I"
man:man         <subj><p2>              # "You"
witin:witin     <subj><p3>              # "He/She/It"
yawan:yawan     <subj><p1><pl><incl>    # "I + You"

ai:ai           <obj><p1>               # "me"
mai:mai         <obj><p2>               # "you"
wan:wan         <obj><p1><pl><incl>     # "us"

wan:wan         <pos><p1><pl><incl>     # "our"
ai:ai           <pos><p3>               # "his/her/its"


LEXICON Exclamation
monin:monin         # "hello"

LEXICON Adverbs
